GRAMMARS/FRENCH/APPLICATIONS/ACCENTUATION/FST2/src/lex-func.lexc
LEXICON APO		< (%+Apo) >	#;

LEXICON PrepDE
de+Prep				APO ;
de+Prep=le+Det+Def+Sg+Masc:du	# ;
de+Prep=le+Det+Def+Pl+MF:des	# ;
	
LEXICON PrepA
à+Prep+Typo:á			#;
à+Prep				#;
à+Prep=le+Det+Def+Sg+Masc:au	# ;
à+Prep=le+Det+Def+Pl+MF:aux	# ;

LEXICON ROOT
que+Conj+Que				APO;
le+Det+Def+Sg+Masc:le		APO ;
le+Det+Def+Sg+Fem:la		APO ;
de+Det+Prtf+SgPl+MF:de		APO ;
tout% le+Det+Quant+Sg+Masc:tout% le		APO ;
tout0% le+Det+Quant+Sg+Fem:toute% la		APO ;
je+Pron+Pers+Clitic+Nom+Sg+MF+P1:je		APO;
je+Pron+Pers+Clitic+Acc+Sg+MF+P1:me		APO;
je+Pron+Pers+Clitic+Dat+Sg+MF+P1:me		APO;
tu+Pron+Pers+Clitic+Acc+Sg+MF+P2:te		APO;
tu+Pron+Pers+Clitic+Dat+Sg+MF+P2:te		APO;
il+Pron+Pers+Clitic+Acc+Sg+Masc+P3:le		APO;
il+Pron+Pers+Clitic+Acc+Sg+Fem+P3:la		APO;
se+Pron+Refl+Clitic+Acc+Dat+SgPl+MF+P3		APO;
ce+Pron+Dem+Masc+Sg		APO;
à% ce% que+Conj+Subord			APO;	! [1]
à% condition% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
afin% que+Conj+Subord			APO;	! [1]
ainsi% que+Conj+Compar			APO;	! [1]
à% la% condition% que+Conj+Subord	APO;	! [1]
alors% même% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
alors% que+Conj+Subord			APO;	! [1]
à% présent% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
après% que+Conj+Subord			APO;	! [1]
à% proportion% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
à% tel% point% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
attendu% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
au% fur% et% à% mesure% que+Conj+Subord	APO;	! [1]
au% lieu% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
au% point% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
aussi% bien% que+Conj+Compar		APO;	! [1]
aussitôt% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
autant% que+Conj+Compar			APO;	! [1]
avant% que+Conj+Subord			APO;	! [1]
bien% que+Conj+Subord			APO;
cependant% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
c'est-à-dire% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
chaque% fois% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
comme% si+Conj+Subord			APO;	! [1]
d'aussi% loin% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
d'autant% mieux% que+Conj+Subord	APO;	! [1]
d'autant% moins% que+Conj+Subord	APO;	! [1]
d'autant% plus% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
d'autant% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
de% ce% que+Conj+Subord			APO;	! [1]
de% crainte% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
de% façon% à% ce% que+Conj+Subord	APO;	! [1]
de% façon% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
de% manière% à% ce% que+Conj+Subord	APO;	! [1]
de% manière% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
de% même% que+Conj+Compar			APO;	! [1]
de% même% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
de% peur% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
depuis% que+Conj+Subord			APO;	! [1]
dès% l'instant% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
dès% lors% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
de% sorte% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
dès% que+Conj+Subord			APO;	! [1]
de% telle% façon% que+Conj+Subord	APO;	! [1]
de% telle% manière% que+Conj+Subord	APO;	! [1]
de% telle% sorte% que+Conj+Subord	APO;	! [1]
du% fait% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
du% moment% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
du% plus% loin% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
en% attendant% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
en% ce% sens% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
encore% que+Conj+Subord			APO;	! [1]
en% sorte% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
étant% donné% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
jusqu'à% ce% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
jusqu'à% tant% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
loin% que+Conj+Subord			APO;	! [1]
lors% même% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
lorsque+Conj+Subord			APO;
maintenant% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
malgré% que+Conj+Subord			APO;	! [1]
non% moins% que+Conj+Compar		APO;	! [1]
non% pas% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
non% que+Conj+Subord			APO;	! [1]
outre% que+Conj+Subord			APO;	! [1]
parce% que+Conj+Subord			APO;
pas% plus% que+Conj+Compar		APO;	! [1]
pendant% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
pour% autant% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
pour% peu% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
pour% que+Conj+Subord			APO;	! [1]
pour% une% fois% que+Conj+Subord	APO;	! [1]
pourvu% que+Conj+Subord			APO;	! [1]
puisque+Conj+Subord			APO;
quoique+Conj+Subord			APO;
quoi% que+Conj+Subord			APO;	! [1]
sans% que+Conj+Subord			APO;	! [1]
sauf% que+Conj+Subord			APO;	! [1]
sauf% si+Conj+Subord			APO;	! [1]
selon% que+Conj+Subord			APO;	! [1]
si% bien% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
si% ce% n'est% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
si+Conj+Subord				APO;
sinon% que+Conj+Subord			APO;	! [1]
si% peu% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
si% tant% est% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
sitôt% que+Conj+Subord			APO;	! [1]
soit% que+Conj+Subord			APO;	! [1]
suivant% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
supposé% que+Conj+Subord		APO;	! [1]
tandis% que+Conj+Subord			APO;	! [1]
tant% et% si% bien% que+Conj+Subord	APO;	! [1]
tant% que+Conj+Subord			APO;	! [1]
toujours% est-il% % que+Conj+Subord	APO;	! [1]
vu% que+Conj+Subord			APO;	! [1]
à% ce% stade% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
à% côté% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
afin% 				PrepDE;	! [xip]
à% force% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
à% l'abord% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
à% la% dévotion% 		PrepDE;	! [1]
à% l'adresse% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
à% l'affût% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
à% la% gloire% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
à% la% hauteur% 		PrepDE;	! [1]
à% la% lumière% 		PrepDE;	! [1]
à% la% mémoire% 		PrepDE;	! [1]
à% la% portée% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
à% la% solde% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
à% la% tête% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
à% la% veille% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
à% l'égard% 			PrepDE;	! [xip]
alentour% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
à% l'épreuve% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
à% l'exclusion% 		PrepDE;	! [1]
à% l'initiative% 		PrepDE;	! [1]
à% l'insu% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
à% l'inverse% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
à% l'occasion% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
à% l'origine% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
à% partir% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
à% propos% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
à% raison% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
à% titre% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
au% bord% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
au% coeur% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
au% contraire% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
au% cours% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
au-deçà% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
au-dehors% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
au-delà% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
au-dessus% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
au-devant% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
au% fond% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
au% gré% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
au% large% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
au% long% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
au% moment% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
au% nez% et% à% la% barbe% 	PrepDE;	! [1]
au% nom% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
au% point% de% vue% 		PrepDE;	! [1]
auprès% 			PrepDE;	! [xip]
au% profit% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
au% rang% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
au% rebours% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
au% risque% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
au% sortir% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
au% terme% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
autour% 			PrepDE;	! [xip]
au% vu% et% au% su% 		PrepDE;	! [1]
aux% alentours% 		PrepDE;	! [1]
aux% bons% soins% 		PrepDE;	! [1]
aux% dépens% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
aux% environs% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
compte% non% tenu% 		PrepDE;	! [1]
conformément% 			PrepA;	! [1]
contrairement% 			PrepA;	! [1]
dans% la% direction% 		PrepDE;	! [1]
dans% le% cadre% 		PrepDE;	! [1]
dans% le% contexte% 		PrepDE;	! [1]
dans% le% domaine% 		PrepDE;	! [1]
dans% le% sein% 		PrepDE;	! [1]
dans% l'optique% 		PrepDE;	! [1]
de% l'ordre% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
de% peur% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
de+Prep				APO;
du% fait% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
d'un% bout% à% l'autre% 	PrepDE;	! [1]
en% âge% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
en% arrière% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
en% avant% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
en% bordure% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
en% compagnie% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
en% considération% 		PrepDE;	! [1]
en% cours% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
en-deçà% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
en% dépit% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
en% direction% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
en% face% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
en% fin% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
en% forme% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
en% haut% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
en% instance% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
en% manière% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
en% même% temps% que+Prep	APO;	! [1]
en% passe% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
en% présence% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
en% raison% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
en% regard% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
en% train% 			PrepDE;	! [xip]
en% vertu% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
en% vue% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
eu% égard% 			PrepA;	! [1]
face% 				PrepA;	! [xip]
faute% 				PrepDE;	! [1]
grâce% 				PrepA;	! [1]
indépendamment% 		PrepDE;	! [1]
jusqu'				PrepA;	!+
jusque+Prep			APO;
loin% 				PrepDE;	! [1]
par% crainte% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
par% le% canal% 		PrepDE;	! [1]
par% le% moyen% 		PrepDE;	! [1]
par% le% truchement% 		PrepDE;	! [1]
par% peur% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
par% rapport% 			PrepA;	! [xip]
pour% cause% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
près% 				PrepDE;	! [xip]
quant% 				PrepA;	! [1]
rapport% 			PrepA;	! [1]
relativement% 			PrepA;	! [1]
sans% préjudice% 		PrepDE;	! [1]
sauf% 				PrepA;	! [1]
sous% forme% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
sous% l'auspice% 		PrepDE;	! [1]
sous% le% couvert% 		PrepDE;	! [1]
sous% le% rapport% 		PrepDE;	! [1]
sous% l'oeil% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
sous% prétexte% 		PrepDE;	! [1]
suite% 				PrepA;	! [1]
sur% le% vu% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
vis-à-vis% 			PrepDE;	! [1]
